CIK: 885725
Company Name: BOSTON SCIENTIFIC CORP
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2013-02-22
Accession Number: 0000885725-13-000007


ITEM 1 BUSINESS The Company Boston Scientific Corporation is a worldwide developer, manufacturer and marketer of medical devices that are used in a broad range of interventional medical specialties. Our mission is to transform lives through innovative medical solutions that improve the health of patients around the world. When used in this report, the terms we, us, our and the Company mean Boston Scientific Corporation and its divisions and subsidiaries. Our history began in the late 1960s when our co founder, John Abele, acquired an equity interest in Medi tech, Inc., a research and development company focused on developing alternatives to surgery. In 1969, Medi tech introduced a family of steerable catheters used in some of the first less invasive procedures performed. In 1979, John Abele joined with Pete Nicholas to form Boston Scientific Corporation, which indirectly acquired Medi tech. This acquisition began a period of active and focused marketing, new product development and organizational growth. Since then, we have advanced the practice of less invasive medicine by helping physicians and other medical professionals treat a variety of diseases and conditions and improve patients quality of life by providing alternatives to surgery and other medical procedures that are typically traumatic to the body. Our net sales have increased substantially since our formation over thirty years ago. Our growth has been fueled in part by strategic acquisitions designed to improve our ability to take advantage of growth opportunities in the medical device industry. Our strategic acquisitions have helped us to add promising new technologies to our pipeline and to offer 1 of the broadest product portfolios in the world for use in less invasive procedures. We believe that the depth and breadth of our product portfolio has also enabled us to compete more effectively in the current healthcare environment of cost containment, managed care, large buying groups, government contracting, hospital consolidation, and international expansion and will generally assist us in navigating through the complexities of the global healthcare market, including healthcare reform. Business Strategy The following are our five strategic imperatives Strengthen Execution to Grow Share We believe that our success will be driven by our ability to consistently deliver initiatives that grow profitability and market share. We are focused on improving the speed and performance of our business units by adding new capabilities, processes, and innovative technologies. Expand into High Growth Adjacencies We seek to diversify our product portfolio by realigning our research and development spend and focusing our business development investment toward higher growth opportunities. We are focused on executing on our committed growth adjacencies while increasing our access to developing technologies. Through this diversification we expect to increase our opportunity for growth in areas that complement our core businesses. Drive Global Expansion We are focused on expanding into the emerging markets. By expanding our global commercial presence, we seek to increase revenue and market share, and strengthen our relationships with leading physicians and their clinical research programs. We are focused on building new capabilities in countries whose economies and healthcare sectors are growing rapidly. We have local leadership teams with extensive in country experience to help strengthen our position in these fast growing regions. Fund the Journey to Fuel Growth We are driving continuous improvement to expand our profitability, optimizing our manufacturing cost structure, reducing our corporate infrastructure and re allocating spending to support our growth initiatives. 3 Table of Contents Develop Key Capabilities We intend to develop key capabilities by providing economic and customer focused solutions so that our product portfolio is aligned to the needs of the market place and by developing core internal skills to better manage our business in a dynamic and evolving environment. We are globally focused on building a culture of empowerment and engagement while improving our diversity. We believe that our execution of these strategic imperatives will drive innovation, accelerate profitable revenue growth and increase stockholder value. Products During 2012, our products were offered for sale by seven core businesses Interventional Cardiology, Cardiac Rhythm Management (CRM), Endoscopy, Peripheral Interventions, Urology Women Health, Neuromodulation, and Electrophysiology. In January 2011, we closed the sale of our Neurovascular business to Stryker Corporation. We continue to generate sales from the Neurovascular business pursuant to our supply and distribution agreements with Stryker; however, these sales are at significantly lower levels and at reduced gross profit margins as compared to periods prior to the divestiture. During 2012, we derived 30 percent of our sales from our Interventional Cardiology business, 26 percent of our sales from our CRM business, 17 percent of our sales from our Endoscopy business, 11 percent of our sales from our Peripheral Interventions business, seven percent of our sales from our Urology Women Health business, five percent of our sales from our Neuromodulation business, and 2 percent of our sales from our Electrophysiology business. Approximately 2 percent of our 2012 sales were derived from the Neurovascular business that we sold to Stryker Corporation. The following section describes certain of our product offerings Endoscopy Gastroenterology We market a broad range of products to diagnose, treat and ease a variety of digestive diseases, including those affecting the esophagus, stomach, liver, pancreas, duodenum, and colon. Common disease states include esophagitis, portal hypertension, peptic ulcers as well as esophageal, biliary, pancreatic and colonic cancer. We offer the Radial Jaw 4 Single Use Biopsy Forceps, which are designed to enable collection of large high quality tissue specimens without the need to use large channel therapeutic endoscopes. Our exclusive line of RX Biliary System devices are designed to provide greater access and control for physicians to diagnose and treat challenging conditions of the bile ducts, such as removing gallst1s, opening obstructed bile ducts and obtaining biopsies in suspected tumors. We also market the Spyglass Direct Visualization System for direct imaging of the pancreatico biliary system. The Spyglass System is the first single operator cholangioscopy device that offers clinicians a direct visualization of the pancreatico biliary system and includes supporting devices for tissue acquisition, st1 management and lithotripsy. Our products also include the WallFlex family of stents, in particular, the WallFlex Biliary line and WallFlex Esophageal line; and in 2012, we launched our WallFlex Biliary Transheptic stent system for treatment of biliary strictures. In addition, we continue to see growth of our hemostasis franchise on the continued adoption and utilization of our Resolution Clip Device for gastrointestinal bleeding. In December of 2012, the first patient enrolled in our study comparing the WallFlex Biliary RX Fully Covered self expanding metal stent (SEMS) to plastic stents for the treatment of benign bile duct strictures caused by chronic pancreatitis. SEMS, which have a significantly larger diameter than plastic biliary stents, have long been the standard of care for palliation of malignant biliary strictures. This study is evaluating the benefits of using a SEMS in benign biliary strictures, with an objective to demonstrate stricture resolution in fewer procedures. 4 Table of Contents Interventional Bronchoscopy We market devices to diagnose, treat and ease pulmonary disease systems within the airway and lungs. Our products are designed to help perform biopsies, retrieve foreign bodies from the airway, open narrowings of an airway, stop internal bleeding, and ease symptoms of some types of airway cancers. Our product line includes pulmonary biopsy forceps, transbronchial aspiration needles, cytology brushes and tracheobronchial stents used to dilate narrowed airway passages or for tumor management. In October 2010, we completed our acquisition of Asthmatx, Inc., which adds to our Endoscopy portfolio a less invasive, catheter based bronchial thermoplasty procedure for the treatment of severe persistent asthma. The Alair Bronchial Thermoplasty System, developed by Asthmatx, has both Conformite Europeenne (CE) Mark and U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) approval and is the first device based asthma treatment approved by the FDA. In the third quarter of 2012, the America Medical Association (AMA) Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) editorial panel assigned category I CPT codes specifically for bronchial thermoplasty beginning January 1, 2013 Once recognized, the Category I CPT procedure codes will be available for all public and private health insurance payers in the United States, which will allow physicians and hospitals to seek reimbursement for bronchial thermoplasty procedures. We believe these codes will provide greater access to treatment for patients with poorly controlled severe asthma, help facilitate claims processing and help private payers' approve coverage for this form of treatment. We continue to focus on driving commercialization and increased awareness of the Alair System. Peripheral Interventions (PI) We sell various products designed to treat patients with peripheral disease (disease which appears in blood vessels other than in the heart and in the biliary tree), including a broad line of medical devices used in percutaneous transluminal angioplasty (PTA) and peripheral vascular stenting. Our peripheral product offerings include stents, balloon catheters, wires, peripheral embolization devices and vena cava filters. We launched 3 new peripheral angioplasty balloons in 2011, including our next generation Mustang percutaneous transluminal angioplasty balloon, our Coyote balloon catheter, a highly deliverable and ultra low profile balloon dilatation catheter designed for a wide range of peripheral angioplasty procedures and our Charger PTA Balloon Catheter, a 0.035 percutaneous transluminal angioplasty balloon catheter designed for post stent dilatation as well as conventional balloon angioplasty to open blocked peripheral arteries. With our Coyote, Mustang and Charger devices, we offer balloons across all size platforms. In 2012, we launched our EPIC self expanding nitinol stent system in the U.S. and certain international markets, the Carotid WALLSTENT stent system in Japan, and Innova self expanding bare metal stent system in Europe and certain international markets. In February 2011, we announced the acquisitions of S.I. Therapies and ReVascular Therapeutics, Inc., which added to our PI portfolio a re entry catheter and intraluminal chronic total occlusion (CTO) crossing device, enabling endovascular treatment in cases that typically cannot be treated with standard endovascular devices. In 2011, we commenced a limited market release of our OFFROAD re entry catheter system in certain international markets, and in February 2012, we launched our TRUEPATH intraluminal CTO device in the U.S., EMEA, and other international markets. We believe that offering these devices will enhance our position in assisting physicians in addressing the challenges of treating complex peripheral lesions. In the fourth quarter of 2012, we acquired Vessix Vascular, Inc., a developer of catheter based renal denervation systems for the treatment of uncontrolled hypertension. We expect to launch this platform commercially in Europe and other international markets in 2013 We also sell products designed to treat patients with non vascular disease (disease that appears outside the blood system). Our non vascular suite of products includes biliary stents, drainage catheters and micro puncture sets designed to treat, diagnose and ease various forms of benign and malignant tumors. We continue to market our extensive line of Interventional Oncology product solutions, including the recently launched Renegade HI FLO Fathom microcatheter and guidewire system and Interlock 35 Fibered IDC Occlusion System for peripheral embolization. Neuromodulation Within our Neuromodulation business, we market the Precision Spinal Cord Stimulation (SCS) system, used for the management of chronic pain. This system delivers pain management by applying an electrical signal to mask pain signals traveling from the spinal cord to the brain. In addition, during the fourth quarter of 2012 we received CE Mark approval for the Precision Spectra Spinal Cord Stimulator System and began a European market launch of this technology. The Precision Spectra system is the world's first and only SCS system with 32 contacts and 32 dedicated power sources and is designed to provide improved pain relief to a wide range of patients who suffer from chronic pain. In 2011, we launched our Clik Anchor for our Precision Plus SCS System, the world's first rechargeable SCS device for chronic pain management. In the fourth quarter of 2011, we received FDA approval for and launched the Infinion 16 Percutaneous Lead, the world's first and only 16 contact percutaneous lead. We also market the Linear 3 4 and Linear 3 6 Percutaneous Leads for use with our SCS systems, which are designed to provide physicians more treatment options for their chronic pain patients. These leads provide the broadest range of percutaneous lead configurations in the industry. 5 Table of Contents We believe that we continue to have a technology advantage compared to our competitors with proprietary features such as Multiple Independent Current Control, which is intended to allow the physician to target specific areas of pain more precisely. We are looking to strengthen the clinical evidence with spinal cord stimulation and are committed to studies designed to demonstrate cost effectiveness or demonstrate the value of proprietary features in our SCS system. In January 2011, we completed the acquisition of Intelect Medical, Inc., a development stage company developing advanced visualization and programming for the Vercise system. We believe this acquisition leverages the core architecture of our Vercise platform and will advance our technology in the field of deep brain stimulation. During the third quarter of 2012, we received CE Mark approval for the use of our Vercise Deep Brain Stimulation (DBS) System for the treatment of Parkinson's disease in Europe. We believe we have an exciting opportunity in DBS with our ability to customize the field designed to precisely stimulate the target without extraneous stimulation of adjacent areas that may cause unwanted side effects. Urology Women Health Our Urology Women Health division develops, manufactures and sells devices to treat various urological and gynecological disorders. Within our Urology business, we sell a variety of products designed to treat patients with urinary st1 disease and benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH). We offer a full line of st1 management products, including ureteral stents, wires, lithotripsy devices, st1 retrieval devices, sheaths, balloons and catheters. Within our Women's health business, we market a range of devices for the treatment of conditions such as female urinary incontinence, pelvic floor reconstruction (rebuilding of the anatomy to its original state), and menorrhagia (excessive menstrual bleeding). We offer a full breadth of mid urethral sling products, sling materials, graft materials, pelvic floor reconstruction kits, and suturing devices. We market our Genesys Hydro ThermAblator (HTA) system, a next generation endometrial ablation system designed to ablate the endometrial lining of the uterus in premenopausal women with menorrhagia. The Genesys HTA System features a smaller and lighter console, simplified set up requirements, and an enhanced graphic user interface and is designed to improve operating performance. Electrophysiology Within our Electrophysiology business, we develop less invasive medical technologies used in the diagnosis and treatment of rate and rhythm disorders of the heart. Included in our product offerings are radio frequency (RF) generators, steerable RF ablation catheters, intracardiac ultrasound catheters, diagnostic catheters, delivery sheaths, and other accessories. Our leading products include the Blazer and Blazer Prime line of temperature ablation catheters, designed to deliver enhanced performance, responsiveness, and durability. Our cooled ablation portfolio includes the only closed loop irrigated catheter on the market, the Chilli II cooled ablation catheter, and the newly launched Blazer Open Irrigated ablation catheter with a unique Total Tip Cooling Design. In 2012, we received Health Canada and CE Mark approval of the Blazer Open Irrigated Catheter, our latest radiofrequency ablation (RFA) catheter designed to treat a variety of arrhythmias such as atrial fibrillation, atrial flutter, ventricular tachycardia and other supraventricular tachycardias. Additionally, on October 9, 2012, we acquired Rhythmia Medical, Inc., a developer of next generation mapping and navigation solutions for use in cardiac catheter ablations and other electrophysiology procedures, including atrial fibrillation and atrial flutter. We believe that this acquisition, as well as the recent and expected product launches, will help to position us to competitively participate in the fast growing Electrophysiology market. Cardiac Rhythm Management We develop, manufacture and market a variety of implantable devices that monitor the heart and deliver electricity to treat cardiac abnormalities, including Implantable cardioverter defibrillator (ICD) systems used to detect and treat abnormally fast heart rhythms (tachycardia) that could result in sudden cardiac death, including the world's first and only commercially available subcutaneous implantable cardioverter defibrillator the S ICD System, and implantable cardiac resynchronization therapy defibrillator (CRT D) systems used to treat heart failure; and Implantable pacemaker systems used to manage slow or irregular heart rhythms (bradycardia), including implantable cardiac resynchronization therapy pacemaker (CRT P) systems used to treat heart failure. A key comp1nt of many of our implantable device systems is our remote LATITUDE Patient Management System, which enables physicians to monitor device performance remotely while patients are in their homes, allowing for more frequent monitoring in order to guide treatment decisions. 6 Table of Contents In the first half of 2012, we launched our INGENIO family of pacemaker systems in the U.S. and EMEA, and in the third quarter of 2012, we received CE Mark approval for use of our INGENIO and ADVANTIO pacemakers in patients in need of a magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) scan, which we believe represents a significant advancement to our family of pacemaker devices. In the second quarter of 2012, we received FDA approval for our INVIVE cardiac resynchronization therapy pacemakers (CRT Ps). INVIVE is built on the same platform as our high voltage cardiac resynchronization therapy defibrillator (CRT Ds), is enabled for remote patient monitoring, and includes features that promote ease of use. Also during the first half of 2012, we completed the acquisition of Cameron Health, Inc. (Cameron). Cameron developed the world's first and only commercially available subcutaneous implantable cardioverter defibrillator the S ICD System, which we believe is a differentiated technology that will provide us the opportunity to both increase our market share in the existing ICD market and expand that market over time. The S ICD system has CE Mark approval and is available in EMEA. In addition, during the third quarter of 2012 we received FDA approval for the S ICD system and commenced a limited commercial launch in the U.S. With this approval, we are now able to offer our U.S. physician customers an entirely new option to treat their patients who are at risk for sudden cardiac arrest. We believe the recent product developments noted above will help to better position us within the CRM market. Interventional Cardiology Coronary Stent Systems Our broad, innovative product offerings have enabled us to become a leader in the interventional cardiology market. This leadership is due in large part to our coronary stent product offerings. Coronary stents are tiny, mesh tubes used in the treatment of coronary artery disease, which are implanted in patients to prop open arteries and facilitate blood flow to and from the heart. We believe we have further enhanced the outcomes associated with the use of coronary stents, particularly the processes that lead to restenosis (the growth of neointimal tissue within an artery after angioplasty and stenting), through dedicated internal and external product development, strategic alliances and scientific research of drug eluting stent systems. We market our internally developed and self manufactured PROMUS Element everolimus eluting stent platform in all major markets worldwide, as well as our TAXUS paclitaxel eluting stent line, including our third generation TAXUS Element stent system. We are the only company in the industry to offer a 2 drug platform strategy with our paclitaxel eluting and everolimus eluting stent system offerings, and we offer a broad range of stent sizes. In addition, during the fourth quarter of 2012, we received CE Mark approval for the SYNERGY Everolimus Eluting Platinum Chromium Coronary Stent System featuring an ultra thin abluminal (outer) bioabsorbable polymer coating. The SYNERGY Stent is unique in that its proprietary polymer and everolimus drug coating dissipate by 3 months. This innovation has the potential to improve post implant vessel healing and will eliminate long term polymer exposure, a possible cause of late adverse events. In the first quarter of 2013, we also received CE Mark approval and launched our next generation Promus PREMIER Everolimus Eluting Platinum Chromium Coronary Stent System in Europe and other select geographies. Core Coronary Technology We market a broad line of products used to treat patients with atherosclerosis, a principal cause of coronary artery obstructive disease which is characterized by a thickening of the walls of the coronary arteries and a narrowing of arterial openings caused by the progressive development of deposits of plaque. Our product offerings include balloon catheters, rotational atherectomy systems, guide wires, guide catheters, embolic protection devices, and diagnostic catheters used in percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty (PTCA) procedures, as well as intravascular ultrasound (IVUS) imaging system. In addition, in October 2012, we completed the acquisition of BridgePoint Medical, Inc., a developer of proprietary, catheter based systems to treat coronary chronic total occlusions (CTOs). Through this acquisition we expect to augment our current portfolio of Interventional Cardiology products, which we believe will enable us to be a single source supplier for complex PCI procedures. During 2012 we received FDA clearance for our Emerge Percutaneous Transluminal Coronary Angioplasty (PTCA) Balloon Dilatation Catheter and began marketing the device in the United States. The Emerge Catheter is a next generation pre dilatation balloon catheter designed specifically to offer exceptional deliverability for physicians to address challenging lesions in coronary arteries. Both the Monorail and Over The Wire (OTW) options are available. The Emerge Catheter has been commercially available in CE Mark countries since the second quarter of 2012 Intraluminal Ultrasound Imaging We market a family of intraluminal catheter directed ultrasound imaging catheters and systems for use in coronary arteries and heart chambers as well as certain peripheral vessels. The iLab Ultrasound Imaging System continues as our flagship console and is compatible with our full line of imaging catheters. This system is designed to enhance the diagnosis and treatment of blocked vessels and heart disorders. Further, iLab systems have been placed in cardiology labs worldwide which provide an installed base through which we expect to launch new products, including an improved line of coronary Intravascular Vessel Imaging catheters and an integrated Fractional Flow Reserve (FFR) device. Following regulatory approval, these Imaging products would provide our cardiology sales force with a differentiated product offering in 1 of the fastest growing segments of interventional cardiology. 7 Table of Contents Structural Heart Therapy In January 2011, we completed the acquisition of Sadra Medical, Inc. (Sadra). Through the acquisition of Sadra, we are developing a fully repositionable and retrievable device for transcatheter aortic valve replacement (TAVR) to treat through patients with severe aortic stenosis. The Lotus Valve System consists of a stent mounted tissue valve prosthesis and catheter delivery system for guidance and placement of the valve. The low profile delivery system and introducer sheath are designed to enable accurate positioning, repositioning and retrieval at any time prior to release of the aortic valve implant. We believe TAVR is 1 of the fastest growing medical device markets. In March 2011, we completed the acquisition of Atritech, Inc. (Atritech). Atritech developed a novel device designed to close the left atrial appendage in patients with atrial fibrillation (AF) who are at risk for ischemic stroke. The WATCHMAN Left Atrial Appendage Closure Technology (WATCHMAN LAA), developed by Atritech, is the first device proven in a randomized clinical trial to offer an alternative to anticoagulant drugs, and is approved for use in CE Mark countries. Additionally in August 2012, European regulators approved an expanded indication for the WATCHMAN LAA Closure Device. The new indication offers patients with AF, and a contraindication to warfarin and the newer oral anticoagulants, a new treatment option for stroke reduction. Innovation Our approach to innovation combines internally developed products and technologies with those we may obtain externally through strategic acquisitions and alliances. Our research and development efforts are focused largely on the development of next generation and novel technology offerings across multiple programs and divisions. In addition, we have undertaken strategic acquisitions to help enable us to continue to be a leader in the medical device industry. We expect to continue to invest in our core franchises, and also investigate opportunities to further expand our presence in, and diversify into, strategic growth adjacencies. We have closed several acquisitions targeting many of these areas. In 2011, we completed the acquisitions of Sadra Medical, Inc., Intelect Medical, Inc., and Atritech, Inc., and in 2012, we completed the acquisitions of Cameron Health Inc., BridgePoint Medical, Inc., Rhythmia Medical Inc., and Vessix Vascular Inc., all discussed above. There can be no assurance that technologies developed internally or acquired through acquisitions and alliances will achieve technological feasibility, obtain regulatory approvals or gain market acceptance, and any delay in the development or approval of these technologies may adversely impact our ability to drive future growth. Research and Development Our investment in research and development is critical to driving our future growth. We expended $886 million on research and development in 2012, $895 million in 2011 and $939 million in 2010, representing approximately 12 percent of our net sales each year. Our investment in research and development reflects regulatory compliance, clinical science, and internal research and development programs, as well as other programs obtained through our strategic acquisitions and alliances; and engineering efforts which incorporate customer feedback into continuous improvement efforts for currently marketed and next generation products. We have directed our development efforts toward regulatory compliance and innovative technologies designed to expand current markets or enter adjacent markets. We are transforming the way we conduct research and development and are scrutinizing our cost structure, which we expect will enhance our overall efficiency and effectiveness. Our approach to new product design and development is through focused, cross functional teams. We believe that our formal process for technology and product development aids in our ability to offer innovative and manufacturable products in a consistent and timely manner. Involvement of the research and development, clinical, quality, regulatory, manufacturing and marketing teams early in the process is the cornerst1 of our product development cycle. This collaboration allows these teams to concentrate resources on the most viable and clinically relevant new products and technologies, and focus on bringing them to market in a timely and cost effective manner. In addition to internal development, we work with hundreds of leading research institutions, universities and clinicians around the world to develop, evaluate and clinically test our products. We believe our future success will depend upon the strength of these development efforts. 8 Table of Contents Marketing and Sales During 2012, we marketed our products to over 13,000 hospitals, clinics, outpatient facilities and medical offices in nearly 100 countries worldwide. The majority of our net sales are derived from countries in which we have direct sales organizations. We also have a ne2rk of distributors and dealers who offer our products in certain countries and markets, which accounts for our remaining sales. We expect to continue to leverage our infrastructure in markets where commercially appropriate and use third parties in those markets where it is not economical or strategic to establish or maintain a direct presence. We are not dependent on any single institution and no single institution accounted for more than ten percent of our net sales in 2012 or 2011; however, large group purchasing organizations, hospital ne2rks and other buying groups have become increasingly important to our business and represent a substantial portion of our U.S. net sales. We have a dedicated corporate sales organization in the U.S. focused principally on selling to major buying groups and integrated healthcare ne2rks. We consistently strive to understand and exceed the expectations of our customers. Each of our businesses maintains dedicated sales forces and marketing teams focusing on physicians who specialize in the diagnosis and treatment of different medical conditions. We believe that this focused disease state management enables us to develop highly knowledgeable and dedicated sales representatives and to foster collaborative relationships with physicians. We believe that we have positive working relationships with physicians and others in the medical industry, which enable us to gain a detailed understanding of new therapeutic and diagnostic alternatives and to respond quickly to the changing needs of physicians and their patients. International Operations International net sales accounted for approximately 50 percent of our net sales in 2012 Net sales and operating income attributable to our 2012 geographic regions are presented in Note O Segment Reporting to our 2012 consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this Annual Report, incorporated by reference herein. Our international structure operates through 3 international business units EMEA, consisting of Europe, the Middle East and Africa; Japan; and Inter Continental, consisting of our Asia Pacific and the Americas reporting units. Maintaining and expanding our international presence is an important comp1nt of our long term growth plan. Through our international presence, we seek to increase net sales and market share, leverage our relationships with leading physicians and their clinical research programs, accelerate the time to bring new products to market, and gain access to worldwide technological developments that we can implement across our product lines. We are investing in infrastructure in emerging markets in order to introduce new products and strengthen our sales capabilities in these countries. A discussion of the risks associated with our international operations is included in Item 1A of this Annual Report. As of December 31, 2012, we had six international manufacturing facilities, including 3 in Ireland, 2 in Costa Rica and 1 in Puerto Rico. Approximately 59 percent of our products sold worldwide during 2012 were manufactured at these facilities. Additionally, we maintain international research and development capabilities in Ireland, as well as physician training centers in France and Japan. Manufacturing and Raw Materials We are focused on continuously improving our supply chain effectiveness, strengthening our manufacturing processes and increasing operational efficiencies within our organization. By shifting global manufacturing along product lines, we are able to leverage our existing resources and concentrate on the development and commercial launch of new products and the enhancement of existing products. We continue to implement new systems designed to provide improved quality and reliability, service, greater efficiency and lower supply chain costs, and have substantially increased our focus on process controls and validations, supplier controls, distribution controls and providing our operations teams with the training and tools necessary to drive continuous improvement in product quality. In addition, we remain focused on examining our operations and general business activities to identify cost improvement opportunities in order to enhance our operational effectiveness. Our products are designed and manufactured in technology centers around the world, either by us or third parties. In most cases, the manufacturing of our products is concentrated in 1 or a few locations. We consistently monitor our inventory levels, manufacturing and distribution capabilities, and maintain recovery plans to address potential disruptions that we may encounter. However, significant interruptions in our manufacture of products for an extended duration may result in loss of market share, which could adversely affect our results of operations and financial condition. Many comp1nts used in the manufacture of our products are readily fabricated from commonly available raw materials or off the shelf Item available from multiple supply sources; however, certain Item are custom made to meet our specifications. We believe that in most cases, redundant capacity exists at our suppliers and that alternative sources of supply are available or could be developed within a reasonable period of time. We also have an on going program to identify single source comp1nts and to develop alternative back up supplies and we regularly re address the adequacy and abilities of our suppliers to meet our needs. 9 Table of Contents In certain cases, we may not be able to quickly establish additional or replacement suppliers for specific materials, comp1nts or products, largely due to the regulatory approval system and the complex nature of our manufacturing processes and those of our suppliers. A reduction or interruption in supply, an inability to develop and validate alternative sources if required, or a significant increase in the price of raw materials, comp1nts or products could adversely affect our operations and financial condition, particularly materials or comp1nts related to our CRM products and drug eluting stent systems. In addition, our products require sterilization prior to sale and we utilize a mix of internal resources and third party vendors to perform this service. We believe we have capabilities sufficient to sterilize our products; however, to the extent we or our third party sterilizers are unable to sterilize our products, whether due to capacity, regulatory or other constraints, we may be unable to transition to other providers in a timely manner, which could have an adverse impact on our operations. Pursuant to the Dodd Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act, the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) promulgated final rules regarding disclosure of the use of certain minerals, known as conflict minerals, which are mined from the Democratic Republic of the Congo and adjoining countries. These rules may impose additional costs on us, including for diligence as to the sources of any conflict minerals used in our products, as well as for any resulting changes we make to products, processes, or sources of supply. In addition, these rules could have an adverse effect on the sourcing, supply, and pricing of materials used in our products. Quality Assurance We are committed to providing high quality products to our customers. To meet this commitment, we have implemented updated quality systems and concepts throughout our organization. Our quality system starts with the initial product specification and continues through the design of the product, comp1nt specification process and the manufacturing, sale and servicing of the product. Our quality system is intended to build in quality and process control and to utilize continuous improvement concepts throughout the product life. These systems are designed to enable us to satisfy the various international quality system regulations, including those of the FDA with respect to products sold in the U.S. All of our manufacturing facilities, including our U.S. and European distribution centers, are certified under the ISO13485 quality system standard, established by the International Standards Organization, for medical devices, which requires, among other Item, an implemented quality system that applies to comp1nt quality, supplier control, product design and manufacturing operations. This certification can be obtained only after a complete audit of a company quality system by an independent outside auditor. Maintenance of the certification requires that these facilities undergo periodic re examination. In addition, we maintain an on going initiative to seek ISO14001 certification at our plants around the world. ISO14001 is a globally recognized standard for Environmental Management Systems, established by the International Standards Organization, which provides a voluntary framework to identify key environmental aspects associated with our business. We engage in continuous environmental performance improvement efforts, and at present, as it relates to our major manufacturing and Tier 1 distribution facilities, 13 of our 14 facilities have attained ISO14001 certification. We are committed to achieving ISO14001 certification at all of our major manufacturing facilities and Tier I distribution centers worldwide. Competition We encounter significant competition across our product lines and in each market in which we sell our products from various companies, some of which may have greater financial and marketing resources than we do. Our primary competitors include Abbott Laboratories; Medtronic, Inc.; and St. Jude Medical, Inc. as well as a wide range of medical device companies that sell a single or limited number of competitive products or participate in only a specific market segment. We also face competition from non medical device companies, such as pharmaceutical companies, which may offer alternative therapies for disease states intended to be treated using our products. We believe that our products compete primarily on their ability to safely and effectively perform diagnostic and therapeutic procedures in a less invasive manner, as well as clinical outcomes, ease of use, comparative effectiveness, reliability and physician familiarity. In the current environment of managed care, economically motivated buyers, consolidation among healthcare providers, increased competition and declining reimbursement rates, we have been increasingly required to compete on the basis of price, value, reliability and efficiency. We believe the current global economic conditions and healthcare reform measures could put additional competitive pressure on us, including on our average selling prices, overall procedure rates and market sizes. We recognize that our continued competitive success will depend upon our ability to offer products with differentiated clinical outcomes; create or acquire innovative, scientifically advanced technology; apply our technology cost effectively and with superior quality across product lines and markets; develop or acquire proprietary products; attract and retain skilled personnel; obtain patent or other protection for our products; obtain required regulatory and reimbursement approvals; continually enhance our quality systems; manufacture and successfully market our products either directly or through outside parties; and supply sufficient inventory to meet customer demand. 10 Table of Contents Regulatory Environment The medical devices that we manufacture and market are subject to regulation by numerous worldwide regulatory bodies, including the FDA and comparable international regulatory agencies. These agencies require manufacturers of medical devices to comply with applicable laws and regulations governing the development, testing, manufacturing, labeling, marketing and distribution of medical devices. Devices are generally subject to varying levels of regulatory control, based on the risk level of the device. In the U.S., authorization to commercially distribute a new device generally can be met in 1 of 3 ways. The first process requires that a premarket notification (510(k)) be made to the FDA to demonstrate that the device is as safe and effective as, or substantially equivalent to, a legally marketed device, the predicate device. Applicants must submit performance data to establish substantial equivalence. In some instances, data from human clinical trials must also be submitted in support of a 510(k) premarket notification. If so, these data must be collected in a manner that conforms to the applicable Investigational Device Exemption (IDE) regulations. The FDA must issue a decision finding substantial equivalence before commercial distribution can occur. Changes to cleared devices that could not significantly affect the safety or effectiveness of the device can generally be made without additional 510(k) premarket notifications; otherwise, a new 510(k) is required. The second process requires the submission of a premarket approval (PMA) application to the FDA to demonstrate that the device is safe and effective for its intended use. This approval process applies to most Class III devices, and generally requires clinical data to support the safety and effectiveness of the device, obtained in adherence with IDE requirements. The FDA will approve the PMA application if it finds that there is a reasonable assurance that the device is safe and effective for its intended purpose, and that the proposed manufacturing is in compliance with the Quality System Regulation (QSR). This process is generally more detailed, lengthier and more expensive than the 510(k) process. The third process requires that an application for a Humanitarian Device Exemption (HDE) be made to the FDA for the use of a Humanitarian Use Device (HUD). An HUD is intended to benefit patients by treating or diagnosing a disease or condition that affects, or is manifested in, fewer than 4,000 individuals in the U.S. per year. The application submitted to the FDA for an HDE is similar in both form and content to a PMA application, but is exempt from the effectiveness requirements of a PMA. The HUD provision of the regulation provides an incentive for the development of devices for use in the treatment or diagnosis of diseases affecting smaller patient populations. In the European Union, we are required to comply with applicable medical device directives (including the Medical Devices Directive and the Active Implantable Medical Devices Directive) and obtain CE Mark certification in order to market medical devices. The CE Mark is applied following approval from an independent notified body or declaration of conformity. It is an international symbol of adherence to quality assurance standards and compliance with applicable European Medical Devices Directives. We are also required to comply with the regulations of each other country where we commercialize products, such as the requirement that we obtain approval from the Japanese Ministry of Health, Labor and Welfare (MHLW) before we can launch new products in Japan. The FDA and other worldwide regulatory agencies actively monitor compliance to local laws and regulations through review and inspection of design and manufacturing practices, record keeping, reporting of adverse events, labeling and promotional practices. The FDA can ban certain medical devices; detain or seize adulterated or misbranded medical devices; order repair, replacement or refund of these devices; and require notification of health professionals and others with regard to medical devices that present unreasonable risks of substantial harm to the public health. The FDA may also enjoin and restrain a company for certain violations of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act and the Safe Medical Devices Act pertaining to medical devices, or initiate action for criminal prosecution of such violations. International sales of medical devices manufactured in the U.S. that are not approved by the FDA for use in the U.S., or that are banned or deviate from lawful performance standards, are subject to FDA export requirements. Exported devices are subject to the regulatory requirements of each country to which the device is exported. Some countries do not have medical device regulations, but in most foreign countries, medical devices are regulated. Frequently, regulatory approval may first be obtained in a foreign country prior to application in the U.S. due to differing regulatory requirements; however, other countries, such as China for example, require approval in the country of origin first. Most countries outside of the U.S. require that product approvals be recertified on a regular basis, generally every five years. The recertification process requires that we evaluate any device changes and any new regulations or standards relevant to the device and conduct appropriate testing to document continued compliance. Where recertification applications are required, they must be approved in order to continue selling our products in those countries. Our global regulatory environment is becoming increasingly stringent, and unpredictable, which could increase the time, cost and complexity of obtaining regulatory approvals for our products. Several countries that did not have regulatory requirements for medical devices have established such requirements in recent years and other countries have expanded on existing regulations. Certain regulators are exhibiting less flexibility and are requiring local data in addition to global data. 11 Table of Contents While harmonization of global regulations has been pursued, requirements continue to differ significantly among countries. We expect this global regulatory environment will continue to evolve, which could impact our ability to obtain future approvals for our products, or could increase the cost and time to obtain such approvals in the future. We are also subject to various environmental laws, directives and regulations both in the U.S. and abroad. Our operations, like those of other medical device companies, involve the use of substances regulated under environmental laws, primarily in manufacturing and sterilization processes. We do not believe that compliance with environmental laws will have a material impact on our capital expenditures, earnings or competitive position. However, given the scope and nature of these laws, there can be no assurance that environmental laws will not have a material impact on our results of operations. We assess potential environmental contingent liabilities on a regular basis. At present, we are not aware of any such liabilities that would have a material impact on our business. We believe that sound environmental, health and safety performance contributes to our competitive strength while benefiting our customers, shareholders and employees. We are committed to continuous improvement in these areas by reducing pollution, the depletion of natural resources, and our overall environmental footprint. Specifically, we are working to optimize energy and resource usage, ultimately reducing greenhouse gas emissions and waste. We are certified to the FTSE4Good Corporate Social Responsibility Index, managed by The Financial Times and the London Stock Exchange, which measures the performance of companies that meet globally recognized standards of corporate responsibility. This certification recognizes our dedication to those standards, and it places us in a select group of companies with a demonstrated commitment to responsible business practices and sound environmental policies. Government Affairs We maintain a global Government Affairs presence, headquartered in Washington D.C., to actively monitor and advocate on a myriad of legislation and policies impacting us, both on a domestic and an international front. The Government Affairs office works closely with members of Congress and committee staff, the White House and Administration office, state legislatures and regulatory agencies, and governments overseas on issues affecting our business. Our proactive approach and depth of political and policy expertise are aimed at having our positions heard by federal, state and global decision makers, while also advancing our business objectives by educating policymakers on our positions, key priorities and the value of our technologies. The Government Affairs office also manages our political action committee and works closely with trade groups on issues affecting our industry and healthcare in general. Healthcare Reform Political, economic and regulatory influences are subjecting the healthcare industry to potential fundamental changes that could substantially affect our results of operations. Government and private sector initiatives related to limiting the growth of healthcare costs (including price regulation); competitive pricing; coverage and payment policies; comparative effectiveness of therapies; technology assessments; and health care delivery structure reforms, are continuing in many countries where we do business, including the U.S. These changes are causing the marketplace to put increased emphasis on the delivery of more cost effective treatments. Although we believe our less invasive products and technologies generate favorable clinical outcomes, value and cost efficiency, the resources necessary to demonstrate value to our customers, patients, payors, and other stakeholders may be significant. In addition, uncertainty remains regarding the continued implementation of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (ACA) and its impact to our business. Further, the federal government, as part of the ACA, and certain state governments have enacted laws aimed at increasing transparency in relationships between medical device, biologics and pharmaceutical companies and healthcare professionals (HCPs). As a result, we are required by law to report many types of payments made and Item of value provided to HCPs licensed by certain states. On the federal level, we are required to begin tracking financial relationships in August 2013 and reporting by the end of the first quarter of 2014. We have devoted substantial time and financial resources in order to develop and implement enhanced structure, policies, systems and processes in order to comply with these U.S. federal and state legal and regulatory requirements. In addition, certain foreign jurisdictions are currently acting to implement similar laws. Failure to adhere to our policies, comply with required laws or implement adequate policies and practices to address changes to legal and regulatory requirements could have a negative impact on our results of operations. Additionally, new legislation imposes a 23 percent excise tax on medical device manufacturers on U.S. sales of Class I, II and III medical devices beginning in January 2013 Third Party Coverage and Reimbursement Our products are purchased principally by hospitals, physicians and other healthcare providers around the world that typically bill various third party payors, including governmental programs (e.g., Medicare and Medicaid in the United States), private insurance plans and managed care programs, for the healthcare services provided to their patients. 12 Table of Contents We expect that pricing of medical devices will remain under pressure as alternative payment models such as bundling, value based purchasing and accountable care organizations (ACOs) begin to take shape in the United States. Initiatives to limit the growth of healthcare costs, including price regulation, are also underway in many countries in which we do business. Implementation of cost containment initiatives and healthcare reforms in significant markets such as the U.S., Japan, Europe and other markets may limit the price of, or the level at which reimbursement is provided for, our products and may influence a physician's selection of products used to treat patients. In addition, patients and clinicians are becoming more informed on the risks and benefits of alternative treatments as comparative effectiveness research findings are beginning to be disseminated. Therefore, we believe that compelling clinical and economic data will become increasingly important to demonstrate efficacy and justify the economic benefits of technology purchases. Third party payors and governments may provide or deny coverage for certain technologies and associated procedures based on independently determined assessment criteria. Reimbursement by payors for these services is based on a wide range of methodologies that may reflect the services' assessed resource costs, clinical outcomes and economic value. These reimbursement methodologies confer different, and sometimes conflicting, levels of financial risk and incentives to healthcare providers and patients, and these methodologies are subject to frequent refinements. Third party payors are also increasingly adjusting reimbursement rates, often downwards, and challenging the prices charged for medical products and services. There can be no assurance that our products will be automatically covered by third party payors, that reimbursement will be available or, if available, that the third party payors' coverage policies will not adversely affect our ability to sell our products profitably. Proprietary Rights and Patent Litigation We rely on a combination of patents, trademarks, trade secrets and non disclosure agreements to protect our intellectual property. We generally file patent applications in the U.S. and foreign countries where patent protection for our technology is appropriate and available. As of December 31, 2012, we held more than 15,000 patents, and had approximately 7,300 patent applications pending worldwide that cover various aspects of our technology. In addition, we hold exclusive and non exclusive licenses to a variety of third party technologies covered by patents and patent applications. There can be no assurance that pending patent applications will result in the issuance of patents, that patents issued to or licensed by us will not be challenged or circumvented by competitors, or that these patents will be found to be valid or sufficiently broad to protect our technology or to provide us with a competitive advantage. In the aggregate, these intellectual property assets and licenses are of material importance to our business; however, we believe that no single patent, technology, trademark, intellectual property asset or license, except for those relating to our drug eluting coronary stent systems, is material in relation to our business as a whole. We rely on non disclosure and non competition agreements with employees, consultants and other parties to protect, in part, trade secrets and other proprietary technology. There can be no assurance that these agreements will not be breached, that we will have adequate remedies for any breach, that others will not independently develop equivalent proprietary information or that third parties will not otherwise gain access to our trade secrets and proprietary knowledge. There has been substantial litigation regarding patent and other intellectual property rights in the medical device industry, particularly in the areas in which we compete. We continue to defend ourselves against claims and legal actions alleging infringement of the patent rights of others. Adverse determinations in any patent litigation could subject us to significant liabilities to third parties, require us to seek licenses from third parties, and, if licenses are not available, prevent us from manufacturing, selling or using certain of our products, which could have a material adverse effect on our business. Additionally, we may find it necessary to initiate litigation to enforce our patent rights, to protect our trade secrets or know how and to determine the scope and validity of the proprietary rights of others. Patent litigation can be costly and time consuming, and there can be no assurance that our litigation expenses will not be significant in the future or that the outcome of litigation will be favorable to us. Accordingly, we may seek to settle some or all of our pending litigation, particularly to manage risk over time. Settlement may include cross licensing of the patents that are the subject of the litigation as well as our other intellectual property and may involve m1tary payments to or from third parties. 13 Table of Contents We maintain an insurance policy providing limited coverage against securities claims, and we are substantially self insured with respect to product liability claims and fully self insured with respect to intellectual property infringement claims. The absence of significant third party insurance coverage increases our potential exposure to unanticipated claims or adverse decisions. See Item 3 and Note K Commitments and Contingencies to our 2012 consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this Annual Report for a discussion of intellectual property and other litigation and proceedings in which we are involved. In management opinion, we are not currently involved in any legal proceeding other than those specifically identified in Note K, which, individually or in the aggregate, could have a material effect on our financial condition, operations and or cash flows. Risk Management We have an Enterprise Risk Management (ERM) program in which we provide coordinated oversight, control and continuous improvement of processes and tools used to identify and manage business risk. On an annual basis, we reassess our risks based on the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO) ERM framework in the areas of strategic risk, financial risk, external risk, operational risk and compliance risk with the goal of achieving our business strategies and objectives. This assessment, which engages key individuals from our Board of Directors and management, provides increased visibility into the risks we face, highlights risk interdependencies, and seeks to improve overall risk management effectiveness. Current Economic Climate Our results of operations could be substantially affected by global economic factors and local operating and economic conditions. Our customers may experience financial difficulties or be unable to borrow m1y to fund their operations which may adversely impact their ability or decision to purchase our products, particularly capital equipment, or to pay for our products they do purchase on a timely basis, if at all. We cannot predict to what extent global economic conditions, including the increased focus on healthcare systems and costs in the U.S. and abroad may negatively impact our average selling prices, our net sales and profit margins, procedural volumes and reimbursement rates from third party payors. Employees As of December 31, 2012, we had approximately 24,000 employees, including approximately 12,000 in operations; 6,000 in selling, marketing and distribution; 4,000 in clinical, regulatory and research and development; and 2,000 in administration. Of these employees, we employed approximately 10,000 outside the U.S., approximately 7,000 of whom are in the manufacturing operations function. We believe that the continued success of our business will depend, in part, on our ability to attract and retain qualified personnel, and we are committed to developing our people and providing them with opportunities to contribute to our growth and success. Community Outreach We are committed to making more possible in the communities where we live and work. We bring this commitment to life by supporting global, national and local health and education initiatives, striving to improve patient advocacy, adhering to strong ethical standards that deliver on our commitments, and minimizing our impact on the environment. A prominent example of our ongoing commitment to patients is our Close the Gap program, which aims to eliminate cardiovascular care disparities by helping to ensure all patients regardless of age, gender, race, ethnicity or primary language receive access to optimal cardiac care. To achieve this goal, Close the Gap provides awareness to the community about cardiovascular risk factors, teaches healthcare providers about cultural beliefs and barriers to treatment, and advocates for measures that help ensure all patients receive the cardiovascular care they need. By sponsoring programs and working via partnerships in the community, our Close the Gap program has helped these messages reach over 1 million people. Through the Boston Scientific Foundation, established in 2001, we fund non profit organizations in our local communities. Community grants focus on increasing access to quality healthcare and improving educational opportunities, particularly with regards to science, technology, engineering and math (STEM) education. Boston Scientific has committed to contributing $15 million to our Close the Gap program and STEM education. 14 Table of Contents Seasonality Our worldwide sales do not reflect any significant degree of seasonality; however, customer purchases have historically been lighter in the third quarter of the year, as compared to other quarters. This reflects, among other factors, lower demand during summer months in the northern hemisphere, particularly in European countries. Available Information Copies of our Annual Report on Form 10 K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10 Q, Current Reports on Form 8 K and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, are available free of charge on our website (www.bostonscientific.com) as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file the material with or furnish it to the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). Printed copies of these posted materials are also available free of charge to shareholders who request them in writing from Investor Relations, 1 Boston Scientific Place, Natick, MA 01760 1537. Information on our website or linked to our website is not incorporated by reference into this Annual Report. Safe Harbor for Forward Looking Statements Certain statements that we may make from time to time, including statements contained in this Annual Report and information incorporated by reference into this Annual Report, constitute forward looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Forward looking statements may be identified by words like anticipate, expect, project, believe, plan, may, estimate, intend and similar words. These forward looking statements are based on our beliefs, assumptions and estimates using information available to us at the time and are not intended to be guarantees of future events or performance. These forward looking statements include, among other things, statements regarding our financial performance; our business and results of operations; our business strategy and related financial returns; our growth initiatives, including our emerging markets strategy and investments; acquisitions and related payments, and the integration and impact of acquired businesses and technologies; finalizing the separation of our Neurovascular business; the timing and impact of our restructuring and plant ne2rk optimization initiatives, including expected costs and cost savings; our intention not to pay dividends; use of our cash flow; our outstanding accounts receivable in Europe; our estimates for the U.S. and worldwide CRM markets; our estimates for the worldwide coronary stent market; changes in the market and our market share for our other businesses; procedural volumes and pricing pressures; competitive pressures facing our businesses; our royalty and other expenses; clinical trials, including timing and results; our product portfolio; product development and iterations; new and existing product launches, including their timing and acceptance, and their impact on the market and our business; competitive product launches; product performance and our ability to gain a competitive advantage; the strength of our technologies and pipeline; timing of regulatory approvals; our regulatory and quality compliance; expected research and development efforts and the allocation of research and development expenditures; our sales and marketing strategy; reimbursement practices; the ability of our suppliers and sterilizers to meet our requirements; our ability to meet customer demand; goodwill and other intangible asset impairment analysis and charges; the effect of new accounting pronouncements on our financial results; the impact of healthcare reform legislation, including compliance with the Affordable Care Act; the effect of new and proposed tax laws, including the medical devise excise tax; the outcome and timing of matters before taxing authorities; our tax position and income tax reserves, and our ability to realize all our deferred tax assets; the outcome and impact of intellectual property, qui tam actions, governmental investigations and proceedings and litigation matters; adequacy of our reserves; the drivers and impact of our investment ratings; anticipated expenses and capital expenditures and our ability to finance them; and our ability to meet the financial covenants required by our credit facilities, or to renegotiate the terms of or obtain waivers for compliance with those covenants. If our underlying assumptions turn out to be incorrect, or if certain risks or uncertainties materialize, actual results could vary materially from the expectations and projections expressed or implied by our forward looking statements. As a result, readers are cauti1d not to place undue reliance on any of our forward looking statements. Except as required by law, we do not intend to update any forward looking statements even if new information becomes available or other events occur in the future. The forward looking statements in this Annual Report are based on certain risks and uncertainties, including the risk factors described in Item 1A under the heading Risk Factors and the specific risk factors discussed below and in connection with forward looking statements throughout this Annual Report, which could cause actual results to vary materially from the expectations and projections expressed or implied by our forward looking statements. These factors, in some cases, have affected and in the future could affect our ability to implement our business strategy and may cause actual results to differ materially from those contemplated by the forward looking statements. These additional factors include, among other things, future political, economic, competitive, reimbursement and regulatory conditions; new product introductions; demographic trends; intellectual property; litigation and governmental investigations; financial market conditions; and future business decisions made by us and our competitors, all of which are difficult or impossible to predict accurately and many of which are beyond our control. We caution each reader of this Annual Report to consider carefully these factors. 15 Table of Contents The following are some of the important risk factors that could cause our actual results to differ materially from our expectations in any forward looking statements. For further discussion of these and other risk factors, see Item 1A Risk Factors. Our Businesses Our ability to increase CRM net sales, including for both new and replacement units, expand the market and capture market share; The volatility of the coronary stent market and our ability to increase our drug eluting stent systems net sales, including with respect to our SYNERGY , PROMUS Element and Promus PREMIER stent systems, and capture market share; The on going impact on our business, including CRM and coronary stent businesses, of physician alignment to hospitals, governmental investigations and audits of hospitals, and other market and economic conditions on the overall number of procedures performed, including with respect to the drug eluting coronary stent market the average number of stents used per procedure, and average selling prices; Competitive offerings and related declines in average selling prices for our products, particularly our drug eluting coronary stent systems and our CRM products; The performance of, and physician and patient confidence in, our products and technologies, including our coronary drug eluting stent systems and CRM products, or those of our competitors; The impact and outcome of ongoing and future clinical trials, including coronary stent and CRM clinical trials, and market studies undertaken by us, our competitors or other third parties; Our ability to timely and successfully launch new or next generation products and technology features worldwide and across our businesses in line with our commercialization strategies, including our S ICD system; The effect of consolidation and competition in the markets in which we do business, or plan to do business; Disruption in the manufacture or supply of certain comp1nts, materials or products, or the failure to timely secure alternative manufacturing or additional or replacement comp1nts, materials or products; Our ability to retain and attract key personnel, including in our cardiology and CRM sales force and other key cardiology and CRM personnel; The impact of enhanced requirements to obtain regulatory approval in the U.S. and around the world, including the associated timing and cost of product approval; and The impact of increased pressure on the availability and rate of third party reimbursement for our products and procedures in the U.S and around the world, including with respect to the timing and costs of creating and expanding markets for new products and technologies. 16 Table of Contents Regulatory Compliance and Litigation The impact of healthcare policy changes and legislative or regulatory efforts in the U.S. and around the world to modify product approval or reimbursement processes, including a trend toward demonstrating clinical outcomes, comparative effectiveness and cost efficiency, as well as the impact of other healthcare reform legislation; Risks associated with our regulatory compliance and quality systems and activities in the U.S. and around the world, including meeting regulatory standards applicable to manufacturing and quality processes; Our ability to minimize or avoid future field actions or FDA warning letters relating to our products and processes and the on going inherent risk of potential physician advisories related to medical devices; The impact of increased scrutiny of and heightened global regulatory enforcement facing the medical device industry arising from political and regulatory changes as well as economic pressures; The effect of our litigation and risk management practices, including self insurance, and compliance activities on our loss contingencies, legal provision and cash flows; The impact of, diversion of management attention as a result of, and costs to cooperate with, litigate and or resolve, governmental investigations and our class action, product liability, contract and other legal proceedings; and Risks associated with a failure to protect our intellectual property rights and the outcome of patent litigation. Innovation and Certain Growth Initiatives The timing, size and nature of our strategic growth initiatives and market opportunities, including with respect to our internal research and development platforms and externally available research and development platforms and technologies, and the ultimate cost and success of those initiatives and opportunities; Our ability to complete planned clinical trials successfully, obtain regulatory approvals and launch new and next generation products in a timely manner consistent with cost estimates, including the successful completion of in process projects from purchased research and development; Our ability to identify and prioritize our internal research and development project portfolio and our external investment portfolio on profitable revenue growth opportunities as well as to keep them in line with the estimated timing and costs of such projects and expected revenue levels for the resulting products and technologies; Our ability to successfully develop, manufacture and market new products and technologies in a timely manner and the ability of our competitors and other third parties to develop products or technologies that render our products or technologies noncompetitive or obsolete; The impact of our failure to succeed at or our decision to discontinue, write down or reduce the funding of any of our research and development projects, including in process projects from purchased research and development, in our growth adjacencies or otherwise; Dependence on acquisitions, alliances or investments to introduce new products or technologies and to enter new or adjacent growth markets, and our ability to fund them or to fund contingent payments with respect to those acquisitions, alliances and investments; and The failure to successfully integrate and realize the expected benefits from the strategic acquisitions, alliances and investments we have consummated or may consummate in the future. 17 Table of Contents International Markets Our dependency on international net sales to achieve growth, including in emerging markets; The impact of changes in our international structure and leadership; Risks associated with international operations and investments, including political and economic conditions, protection of our intellectual property, compliance with established and developing local legal and regulatory requirements as well as changes in reimbursement practices and policies; Our ability to maintain or expand our worldwide market positions in the various markets in which we compete or seek to compete, including through investments in product diversification and emerging markets such as Brazil, Russia, India and China; Our ability to execute and realize anticipated benefits from our investments in emerging markets; and The potential effect of foreign currency fluctuations and interest rate fluctuations on our net sales, expenses and resulting margins. Liquidity Our ability to generate sufficient cash flow to fund operations, capital expenditures, global expansion initiatives, litigation settlements, share repurchases and strategic investments and acquisitions as well as maintaining our investment grade ratings and managing our debt levels and covenant compliance; Our ability to access the public and private capital markets when desired and to issue debt or equity securities on terms reasonably acceptable to us; The unfavorable resolution of open tax matters, exposure to additional tax liabilities and the impact of changes in U.S. and international tax laws; The impact of examinations and assessments by domestic and international taxing authorities on our tax provision, financial condition or results of operations; The impact of goodwill and other intangible asset impairment charges, including on our results of operations; and The impact of the European sovereign debt crisis on our ability to collect outstanding and future receivables and or sell receivables under our factoring programs. Cost Reduction and Optimization Initiatives Risks associated with significant changes made or expected to be made to our organizational and operational structure, pursuant to our 2011 Restructuring plan as expanded and as a result of our 2010 Restructuring plan and Plant Ne2rk Optimization program; and Business disruption and employee distraction as we execute our global compliance program, restructuring plans and divestitures of assets or businesses and implementing strategic and restructuring initiatives. 18 Table of Contents ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS In addition to the other information contained in this Annual Report and the exhibits hereto, the following risk factors should be considered carefully in evaluating our business. Our business, financial condition, cash flows or results of operations could be materially adversely affected by any of these risks. This section contains forward looking statements. You should refer to the explanation of the qualifications and limitations on forward looking statements set forth at the end of Item 1 of this Annual Report. Additional risks not presently known to us or that we currently deem immaterial may also adversely affect our business, financial condition, cash flows or results of operations. Declines in average selling prices for our products, particularly our drug eluting coronary stent systems, may materially adversely affect our results of operations. We have experienced pricing pressures across many of our businesses due to competitive activity, increased market power of our customers as the healthcare industry consolidates, economic pressures experienced by our customers, and the impact of managed care organizations and other third party payors. Competitive pricing pressures have particularly affected our drug eluting coronary stent system offerings. We estimate that the average selling price of our drug eluting stent systems in the U.S. decreased seven percent in 2012 as compared to the prior year. Continued declines in average selling prices of our products due to pricing pressures may have an adverse impact on our results of operations. We derive a significant portion of our net sales from the sale of drug eluting coronary stent systems and CRM products. Declines in market size, average selling prices, procedural volumes, and our share of the markets in which we compete; increased competition; market perceptions of studies published by third parties; or product launch delays may materially adversely affect our results of operations and financial condition, including potential future write offs of our goodwill and other intangible assets balances. Net sales from drug eluting coronary stent systems represented approximately 18 percent of our consolidated net sales during 2012 In 2012, lower average selling prices driven by competitive and other pricing pressures and declines in procedural volumes resulted in a decline in our share of the U.S. drug eluting stent market, as well as an overall decrease in the size of the market. There can be no assurance that these and other factors will not further impact our share of the U.S. or worldwide drug eluting stent markets, that we will regain or gain share of the U.S. or worldwide drug eluting stent markets, or that the size of the U.S. drug eluting stent market will reach previous levels or will not decline further, all of which could materially adversely affect our results of operations or financial condition. In addition, a delay in the timing of the launch of next generation products, the overall performance of, and continued physician confidence in, those products may result in a further decline in our market share and have an adverse impact on our results of operations. Net sales from our CRM group represented approximately 26 percent of our consolidated net sales in 2012 Our CRM net sales declined in 2012 primarily due to the impact of average selling price pressures driven by governmental, competitive and other pricing pressures, and lower procedural volumes as a result of continued contraction in the U.S. ICD market. Further, physician reaction to study results published by the Journal of the American Medical Association regarding evidence based guidelines for ICD implants, the U.S. Department of Justice investigation into hospitals' ICD implant practices, the expansion of Medicare recovery audits and ongoing physician alignment to hospitals have had, and may continue to have, a negative impact on the size of the CRM market. Our U.S. ICD sales represented approximately 45 percent of our worldwide CRM net sales in 2012, and any changes in this market could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition or results of operations. There can be no assurance that the size of the CRM market will increase above existing levels or that we will be able to increase CRM market share or increase net sales in a timely manner, if at all. Decreases in market size or our share of the CRM market and decreases in net sales from our CRM products could have a significant impact on our financial condition or results of operations. In addition, our inability to increase our worldwide CRM net sales could result in future goodwill and other intangible asset impairment charges. Further, variability in the timing of the launch of next generation products may result in excess or expired inventory positions and future inventory charges, or may result in a loss of market share and adversely impact our results of operations. Consolidation in the healthcare industry could lead to increased demands for price concessions or the exclusion of some suppliers from certain of our significant market segments, which could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. The cost of healthcare has risen significantly over the past decade and numerous initiatives and reforms by legislators, regulators and third party payors to curb these costs have resulted in a consolidation trend in the healthcare industry, including hospitals. 19 Table of Contents This consolidation has resulted in greater pricing pressures, decreased average selling prices, and the exclusion of certain suppliers from important market segments as group purchasing organizations, independent delivery ne2rks and large single accounts continue to consolidate purchasing decisions for some of our hospital customers. There can be no assurance that measures we may take to address these trends will succeed. We expect that market demand, government regulation, third party reimbursement policies, government contracting requirements, and societal pressures will continue to change the worldwide healthcare industry, resulting in further business consolidations and alliances among our customers and competitors, which may continue to exert further downward pressure on the prices of our products and adversely impact our business, financial condition or results of operations. We face intense competition and may not be able to keep pace with the rapid technological changes in the medical devices industry, which could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. The medical device markets in which we primarily participate are highly competitive. We encounter significant competition across our product lines and in each market in which our products are sold from various medical device companies, some of which may have greater financial and marketing resources than we do. Our primary competitors include Abbott Laboratories; Medtronic, Inc.; and St. Jude Medical, Inc., as well as a wide range of medical device companies that sell a single or limited number of competitive products or which participate in only a specific market segment. We also face competition from non medical device companies, including pharmaceutical companies, which may offer alternative therapies for disease states intended to be treated using our products. Additionally, the medical device markets in which we primarily participate are characterized by extensive research and development, and rapid technological change. Developments by other companies of new or improved products, processes or technologies may make our products or proposed products obsolete or less competitive and may negatively impact our net sales. We are required to devote continued efforts and financial resources to develop or acquire scientifically advanced technologies and products, apply our technologies cost effectively across product lines and markets, obtain patent and other protection for our technologies and products, obtain required regulatory and reimbursement approvals and successfully manufacture and market our products consistent with our quality standards. If we fail to develop new products or enhance existing products, it could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Because we derive a significant amount of our net sales from international operations and a significant percentage of our future growth is expected to come from international operations, including from emerging markets, changes in international economic or regulatory conditions could have a material impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Sales outside the U.S. accounted for approximately 50 percent of our net sales in 2012 Additionally, a significant percentage of our future growth is expected to come from international operations, including from our increased sales presence and other investments in emerging markets such as Brazil, Russia, China and India. We recently created a new Asia Pacific regional organization under new leadership to further increase our capabilities and strengthen our position in this fast growing region. Sales practices in certain international markets, however, may be inconsistent with our desired business practices and U.S. legal requirements, which may impact our ability to expand as planned. In addition, we continue to invest in infrastructure in Brazil, China and India, including the development of a world class training center for healthcare providers and invest in local research and development and clinical studies. However, risks and uncertainties related to political and economic conditions in these regions, traditional business practices, foreign currency fluctuations, interest rate fluctuations, regulatory and reimbursement approvals, competitive offerings, infrastructure development complications and intellectual property protection may adversely impact our ability to implement our business strategy in these markets and, as a result, our sales growth and operating profits from our international operations may be adversely affected. Further, international markets are increasingly being affected by economic pressure to contain reimbursement levels and healthcare costs; and certain international markets may also be impacted by foreign government efforts to understand healthcare practices and pricing in other countries, which could result in increased pricing transparency across geographies and pressure to harmonize reimbursement and ultimately reduce the selling prices of our products. Most international jurisdictions have regulatory approval and periodic renewal requirements for medical devices, and countries that previously did not have regulatory requirements for medical devices may adopt such requirements; we must comply with these requirements in order to market our products in these jurisdictions. In addition, the trend in countries around the world toward more stringent regulatory requirements for product clearance, changing reimbursement models and more rigorous inspection and enforcement activities has generally caused or may cause us and other medical device manufacturers to experience more uncertainty, delay, risk and expense. We expect the international regulatory environment will continue to evolve, which could impact our ability to obtain approvals for our products in those jurisdictions, which may have a material impact on our business. 20 Table of Contents Further, any significant changes in the competitive, political, legal, regulatory, reimbursement or economic environment where we conduct international operations may have a material impact on our business, financial condition or results of operations. If we are unable to manage our debt levels, maintain investment grade credit ratings at the 3 ratings agencies, or experience a disruption in our cash flows it could have an adverse effect on our cost of borrowing, financial condition or results of operations. As part of our strategy to maximize stockholder value we use financial leverage to reduce our cost of capital. Our outstanding debt balance was at $4.256 billion as of December 31, 2012 and $4.261 billion as of December 31, 2011 In February 2012, Moody's Investors Service upgraded our corporate credit rating to Baa3, an investment grade rating, and in July 2011, Fitch Ratings upgraded our corporate credit rating to BBB , an investment grade rating. In addition, Standard & Poor's Ratings Services has maintained an investment grade corporate credit rating for us since 2009. We believe these ratings reflect the strength of our product portfolio and cash flows, the reduction of our debt, and our improved financial fundamentals. Our inability to maintain investment grade credit ratings at the 3 ratings agencies, however, could increase our cost of borrowing funds in the future. Delays in our product development and new product launches, disruption in our cash flow or our ability to continue to effectively manage our debt levels could have an adverse effect on our cost of borrowing, financial condition or results of operations. In addition, our credit facilities contain financial covenants that require us to maintain specified financial ratios. If we are unable to satisfy these covenants, we may be required to obtain waivers from our lenders and no assurance can be made that our lenders would grant such waivers on favorable terms or at all, and we could be required to repay any borrowings on demand. We may record future goodwill impairment charges or other asset impairment charges related to 1 or more of our business or regional reporting units, which could materially adversely impact our results of operations . We test our goodwill balances during the second quarter of each year for impairment, or more frequently if indicators are present or changes in circumstances suggest that impairment may exist. We assess goodwill for impairment at the reporting unit level and, in evaluating the potential for impairment of goodwill, we make assumptions regarding estimated revenue projections, growth rates, cash flows and discount rates. As a result of revised estimates developed during our annual strategic planning process and analysis performed in conjunction with our annual goodwill impairment test in the second quarter of 2012, we concluded that the revenue growth rates projected for our Europe, Middle East and Africa (EMEA) reporting unit would be slightly lower than our previous estimates primarily driven by macro economic factors, and our performance in the European market. We concluded that the goodwill within the EMEA reporting unit was impaired and recorded a non cash $3602 billion ( $3579 billion after tax) charge in the second quarter of 2012 In the third quarter of 2012, we performed an interim goodwill impairment test and recorded a non cash $748 million (pre and after tax) charge associated with our U.S. Cardiac Rhythm Management (U.S. CRM) reporting unit, primarily driven by the reduction in the estimated size of the U.S. CRM market, related adjustments to our business and other competitive factors, which led to lower projected U.S. CRM results compared to prior forecasts. We continue to identify 3 reporting units with goodwill that is at higher risk of potential failure of the first step of the goodwill impairment test in future reporting periods. These reporting units include our U.S. CRM reporting unit, which holds $216 million of remaining allocated goodwill; our U.S. Cardiovascular reporting unit, which holds $2380 billion of allocated goodwill; and our U.S. Neuromodulation reporting unit, which holds $1266 billion of allocated goodwill, each as of December 31, 2012 As of December 31, 2012, the level of excess fair value over carrying value for these reporting units identified as being at higher risk (with the exception of the U.S. CRM reporting unit, whose carrying value continues to exceed its fair value) was approximately seven to 11 percent . During the fourth quarter of 2012, the level of excess fair value over carrying value of our U.S. Cardiovascular reporting unit declined as a result of our performance, declines in our market share due to competitive launches, and continued average selling price declines in the U.S. drug eluting stent (DES) market as a result of continued competitive pressures and declines in procedural volumes. Based on the remaining book value of our U.S. CRM reporting unit following the goodwill impairment charge recorded during the third quarter of 2012, the carrying value of our U.S. CRM reporting unit continues to exceed its fair value, due primarily to the value of amortizable intangible assets allocated to this reporting unit. The remaining book value of the amortizable intangible assets allocated to the U.S. CRM reporting unit was approximately $3303 billion as of December 31, 2012 In accordance with ASC Topic 350, we tested the amortizable intangible assets as of September 30, 2012, in conjunction with the interim goodwill impairment test of our U.S. CRM reporting unit. We performed the impairment analysis of the amortizable intangible assets on an undiscounted cash flow basis, and concluded that these assets were not impaired. However, following the recent declines in our CRM projections, the recoverability of our CRM related amortizable intangibles ( $4.636 billion globally as of December 31, 2012) are sensitive to changes in future cash flow assumptions and our CRM business performance. The $4.636 billion of CRM related amortizable intangibles are at higher risk of potential failure of the first step of the amortizable intangible recoverability test in future reporting periods. An impairment of a material portion of our CRM related amortizable intangibles carrying value would occur if the second step of the amortizable intangible test is required in a future reporting period. 21 Table of Contents On a quarterly basis, we monitor the key drivers of fair value for our reporting units to detect events or other changes that would warrant an interim impairment test of our goodwill. We also monitor quarterly for events or other potential indicators of impairment that would warrant an interim impairment test of our intangible assets. For each of these assets, relatively small declines in the future performance and cash flows of the reporting unit or asset group, changes in our reporting units or in the structure of our business as a result of future reorganizations or divestitures of assets or businesses, or small changes in other key assumptions, may result in the recognition of significant asset impairment charges, which could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations. Failure to integrate acquired businesses into our operations successfully, or effectively manage the separation activities relating to the divestiture of our Neurovascular business, could adversely affect our business, financial condition and operating results. As part of our strategy to realign our business portfolio, we completed several acquisitions in 2012 and 2011 in our strategic growth areas and may pursue additional acquisitions in the future. Our integration of the operations of acquired businesses requires significant efforts, including the coordination of information technologies, research and development, sales and marketing, operations, manufacturing and finance. These efforts result in additional expenses and involve significant amounts of management's time. Some of the factors that could affect the success of our acquisitions include, among others, the strength of the acquired companies' underlying technology and ability to execute, results of clinical trials, regulatory approvals and reimbursement levels of the acquired products and related procedures, our ability to adequately fund acquired in process research and development projects and retain key employees, and our ability to achieve synergies with our acquired companies, such as increasing sales of our products, achieving cost savings and effectively combining technologies to develop new products. Our failure to manage successfully and coordinate the growth of the combined acquired companies could have an adverse impact on our business and our future growth. In addition, we cannot be certain that the businesses we acquire will become profitable or remain so and if our acquisitions are not successful, we may record related asset impairment charges in the future. In addition, we closed the sale of our Neurovascular business to Stryker Corporation in January 2011 The divestiture of this business continues to involve a number of risks, including the diversion of management and employee attention and unexpected costs and delays, including with respect to the transfer of certain manufacturing facilities that we expect to occur during 2013 In addition, we are providing post closing services through a transition services agreement, and are also manufacturing and supplying products to Stryker. These transition services and supply arrangements are expected to end in 2013 Our inability to effectively manage the separation activities and events could adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. We may not be successful in our strategy relating to future strategic acquisitions of, investments in, or alliances with, other companies and businesses, which have been a significant source of historical growth for us, and will be key to our diversification into new markets and technologies. Our strategic acquisitions, investments and alliances are intended to further expand our ability to offer customers effective, high quality medical devices that satisfy their interventional needs. If we are unsuccessful in our acquisitions, investments and alliances, we may be unable to grow our business. These acquisitions, investments and alliances have been a significant source of our growth. The success of our strategy relating to future acquisitions, investments or alliances will depend on a number of factors, including our ability to identify suitable opportunities for acquisition, investment or alliance, if at all; our ability to finance any future acquisition, investment or alliance on terms acceptable to us, if at all; whether we are able to complete an acquisition, investment or alliance on terms that are satisfactory to us, if at all; and intellectual property and litigation related to newly acquired technologies. Any potential future acquisitions we consummate may be dilutive to our earnings and may require additional debt or equity financing, depending on their size or nature. We may not realize the expected benefits from our restructuring and optimization initiatives; our long term expense reduction programs may result in an increase in short term expense; and our efforts may lead to additional unintended consequences. In January 2013, we announced an expansion of our 2011 Restructuring plan (the Expansion), which is intended to further strengthen our operational effectiveness and efficiencies and support new investments, which we expect to increase stockholder value. Key activities under the Expansion include further initiatives to standardize and automate certain processes and activities; relocate select administrative and functional activities; rationalize organizational reporting structures; expand shared services; and align expenses to revenues within certain divisions and geographic regions. In addition, they include further efforts to streamline various corporate functions, eliminate bureaucracy, increase productivity and better align corporate resources to our key business strategies. 22 Table of Contents Further, in February 2010, we announced a 2010 Restructuring plan designed to strengthen and position us for long term success. Key activities under the 2010 Restructuring plan included the integration of our Cardiovascular and CRM businesses, as well as the restructuring of certain other businesses and corporate functions; the realignment of our international structure; and the reprioritization and diversification of our product portfolio. Additionally, in January 2009, we announced our Plant Ne2rk Optimization program, aimed at simplifying our plant ne2rk, reducing our manufacturing costs and improving gross margins. Activities under our 2010 Restructuring plan were completed in 2012, and our Plant Ne2rk Optimization program was substantially completed in 2012 Cost reduction initiatives under these collective plans include various cost and efficiency improvement measures, which may include headcount reductions; the relocation of certain resources as well as administrative and functional activities; the closure of certain facilities; the transfer of certain production lines; the sale of certain non strategic assets and other efforts to streamline our business, among other actions. These measures could yield unintended consequences, such as distraction of our management and employees, business disruption, attrition beyond our planned reduction in workforce and reduced employee productivity. We may be unable to attract or retain key personnel. Attrition beyond our planned reduction in workforce or a material decrease in employee morale or productivity could negatively affect our business, sales, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, headcount reductions may subject us to the risk of litigation, which could result in substantial cost. Moreover, our expense reduction programs result in charges and expenses that impact our operating results. We cannot guarantee that these measures, or other expense reduction measures we take in the future, will result in the expected cost savings. Current domestic and international economic conditions could adversely affect our results of operations. The continued global financial uncertainty, including the European sovereign debt crisis, has caused disruption in the financial markets, including diminished liquidity and credit availability. There can be no assurance that there will not be further deterioration in the global economy and the strength and timing of economic recovery remains uncertain. We cannot predict to what extent the global economic slowdown and European sovereign debt crisis may negatively impact our average selling prices, our net sales and profit margins, procedural volumes and reimbursement rates from third party payors. In addition, current economic conditions may adversely affect our suppliers, leading them to experience financial difficulties or to be unable to borrow m1y to fund their operations, which could cause disruptions in our ability to produce our products. Further, our customers may experience financial difficulties or be unable to borrow m1y to fund their operations which may adversely impact their ability or decision to purchase our products, particularly capital equipment, or to pay for our products they do purchase on a timely basis, if at all. For example, our net sales have been adversely impacted by reductions in procedural volumes due to unemployment levels and other economic factors, and these reductions may continue. In addition, the European sovereign debt crisis may impact our future ability to transfer receivables to third parties in certain Southern European countries. Third parties such as banks offering factoring programs in these countries are looking to reduce their exposure levels to government owned or supported debt. This could result in terminations of, or changes to the costs or credit limits of our existing factoring programs. Such terminations or changes could have a negative impact on our cash flow and days sales outstanding. Within Italy, Spain, and Portugal the number of days our receivables are outstanding has increased above historical levels. While we are pursuing alternative factoring providers and financing arrangements to mitigate our credit exposure to receivables in this region, there can be no assurances that we will be able to mitigate our risk of further reductions in cash flow in this region. In addition, conditions in the financial markets and other factors beyond our control may also adversely affect our ability to borrow m1y in the credit markets and to obtain financing for acquisitions or other general corporate and commercial purposes. Healthcare policy changes, including recently passed healthcare reform legislation, may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows. Political, economic and regulatory influences are subjecting the healthcare industry to potential fundamental changes that could substantially affect our results of operations. Government and private sector initiatives to limit the growth of healthcare costs, including price regulation, competitive pricing, coverage and payment policies, comparative effectiveness of therapies, technology assessments and alternative payment models, are continuing in many countries where we do business, including the U.S. These changes are causing the marketplace to put increased emphasis on the delivery of more cost effective treatments. Our strategic initiatives include measures to address this trend; however, there can be no assurance that any of our strategic measures will successfully address this trend. The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and Health Care and Education Affordability Reconciliation Act of 2010 were enacted into law in the U.S. in March 2010. As a U.S. headquartered company with significant sales in the U.S., this healthcare reform law will materially impact us. Certain provisions of the law will not be effective until 2014 and 2015 and there are many programs and requirements for which the details have not yet been fully established or consequences not fully understood. However, on June 28, 2012, the United States Supreme Court upheld the constitutionality of the law's mandate requiring individuals to purchase health insurance but rejected specific provisions that would have penalized states that did not expand their current Medicaid programs. As a result of this ruling and other factors, we expect implementation of most of the major provisions of the law to continue. As currently enacted, the law imposes on medical device manufacturers a 23 percent excise tax on U.S. sales of 23 Table of Contents Class I, II and III medical devices beginning in 2013 U.S. net sales represented approximately 50 percent of our worldwide net sales in 2012 and, therefore, this tax burden may have a material, negative impact on our results of operations and our cash flows. Other provisions of this law as currently enacted, including comparative effectiveness research, an independent payment advisory board, and pilot programs to evaluate alternative payment methodologies, could meaningfully change the way healthcare is developed and delivered, and may adversely affect our business and results of operations. Further, we cannot predict what healthcare programs and regulations will be ultimately implemented at the federal or state level, or the effect of any future legislation or regulation in the U.S. or internationally. However, any changes that lower reimbursements for our products, reduce medical procedure volumes or increase cost containment pressures on us or other participants in the healthcare industry could adversely affect our business and results of operations. Healthcare cost containment pressures and legislative or administrative reforms resulting in restrictive reimbursement practices of third party payors or preferences for alternate therapies could decrease the demand for our products, the prices which customers are willing to pay for those products and the number of procedures performed using our devices, which could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Our products are purchased principally by hospitals, physicians and other healthcare providers around the world that typically bill various third party payors, including governmental programs (e.g., Medicare and Medicaid), private insurance plans and managed care programs, for the healthcare services provided to their patients. The ability of customers to obtain appropriate reimbursement for their products and services from private and governmental third party payors is critical to the success of medical technology companies. The availability of reimbursement affects which products customers purchase and the prices they are willing to pay. Reimbursement varies from country to country and can significantly impact the acceptance of new products and services. Even if we develop a promising new product, we may find limited demand for the product unless reimbursement approval is obtained from private and governmental third party payors. Further legislative or administrative reforms to the reimbursement systems in the U.S., Japan, or other international countries in a manner that significantly reduces reimbursement for procedures using our medical devices or denies coverage for those procedures, including price regulation, competitive pricing, coverage and payment policies, comparative effectiveness of therapies, technology assessments and managed care arrangements, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Major third party payors for hospital services in the U.S. and abroad continue to work to contain healthcare costs. The introduction of cost containment incentives, combined with closer scrutiny of healthcare expenditures by both private health insurers and employers, has resulted in increased discounts and contractual adjustments to hospital charges for services performed, has led to increased physician employment by hospitals in the U.S., and has shifted services between inpatient and outpatient settings. Initiatives to limit the increase of healthcare costs, including price regulation, are also underway in several countries in which we do business. Hospitals or physicians may respond to these cost containment pressures by substituting lower cost products or other therapies for our products. We are subject to extensive and dynamic medical device regulation, which may impede or hinder the approval or sale of our products and, in some cases, may ultimately result in an inability to obtain approval of certain products or may result in the recall or seizure of previously approved products. Our products, marketing, sales and development activities and manufacturing processes are subject to extensive and rigorous regulation by the FDA pursuant to the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (FDC Act), by comparable agencies in foreign countries, and by other regulatory agencies and governing bodies. Under the FDC Act, medical devices must receive FDA clearance or approval before they can be commercially marketed in the U.S. In the European Union, we are required to comply with applicable medical device directives (including the Medical Devices Directive and the Active Implantable Medical Devices Directive) and obtain CE Mark certification in order to market medical devices. The CE Mark is applied following approval from an independent notified body or declaration of conformity. The process of obtaining marketing approval or clearance from the FDA or by comparable agencies in foreign countries for new products, or with respect to enhancements or modifications to existing products, could take a significant period of time; require the expenditure of substantial resources; involve rigorous pre clinical and clinical testing, as well as increased post market surveillance; require changes to products; and result in limitations on the indicated uses of products. 24 Table of Contents In addition, exported devices are subject to the regulatory requirements of each country to which the device is exported. Some countries do not have medical device regulations, but in most foreign countries, medical devices are regulated. Frequently, regulatory approval may first be obtained in a foreign country prior to application in the U.S. due to differing regulatory requirements; however, other countries, such as China for example, require approval in the country of origin first. Most countries outside of the U.S. require that product approvals be recertified on a regular basis, generally every five years. The recertification process requires that we evaluate any device changes and any new regulations or standards relevant to the device and conduct appropriate testing to document continued compliance. Where recertification applications are required, they must be approved in order to continue selling our products in those countries. There can be no assurance that we will receive the required approvals for new products, recertifications or modifications to existing products on a timely basis or that any approval will not be subsequently withdrawn or conditi1d upon extensive post market study requirements. Our global regulatory environment is becoming increasingly stringent, and unpredictable, which could increase the time, cost and complexity of obtaining regulatory approvals for our products, as well as the clinical and regulatory costs of supporting those approvals. Several countries that did not have regulatory requirements for medical devices have established such requirements in recent years and other countries have expanded on existing regulations. Certain regulators are exhibiting less flexibility and are requiring local data in addition to global data. While harmonization of global regulations has been pursued, requirements continue to differ significantly among countries. We expect this global regulatory environment will continue to evolve, which could impact our ability to obtain future approvals for our products, or could increase the cost and time to obtain such approvals in the future. The FDA and other worldwide regulatory agencies actively monitor compliance with local laws and regulations through review and inspection of design and manufacturing practices, recordkeeping, reporting of adverse events, labeling and promotional practices. The FDA can ban certain medical devices; detain or seize adulterated or misbranded medical devices; order repair, replacement or refund of these devices; and require notification of health professionals and others with regard to medical devices that present unreasonable risks of substantial harm to the public health. The FDA may also enjoin and restrain a company for certain violations of the FDC Act and the Safe Medical Devices Act pertaining to medical devices, or initiate action for criminal prosecution of such violations. International sales of medical devices manufactured in the U.S. that are not approved by the FDA for use in the U.S., or that are banned or deviate from lawful performance standards, are subject to FDA export requirements. Regulations regarding the development, manufacture and sale of medical devices are evolving and subject to future change. We cannot predict what impact, if any, those changes might have on our business. Failure to comply with regulatory requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Later discovery of previously unknown problems with a product or manufacturer could result in fines, delays or suspensions of regulatory clearances, seizures or recalls of products, physician advisories or other field actions, operating restrictions and or criminal prosecution. We may also initiate field actions as a result of a failure to strictly comply with our internal quality policies. The failure to receive product approval clearance on a timely basis, suspensions of regulatory clearances, seizures or recalls of products, physician advisories or other field actions, or the withdrawal of product approval by the FDA or by comparable agencies in foreign countries could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Our products, including those of our cardiovascular businesses, are continually subject to clinical trials conducted by us, our competitors or other third parties, the results of which may be unfavorable, or perceived as unfavorable by the market, and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. As a part of the regulatory process of obtaining marketing clearance for new products, we conduct and participate in numerous clinical trials with a variety of study designs, patient populations and trial endpoints. Unfavorable or inconsistent clinical data from existing or future clinical trials conducted by us, by our competitors or by third parties, or the market's perception of this clinical data, may adversely impact our ability to obtain product approvals, our position in, and share of, the markets in which we participate and our business, financial condition, results of operations or future prospects. Our future growth is dependent upon the development of new products, which requires significant research and development, clinical trials and regulatory approvals, all of which are very expensive and time consuming and may not result in commercially viable products. In order to develop new products and improve current product offerings, we focus our research and development programs largely on the development of next generation and novel technology offerings across multiple programs and businesses. If we are unable to develop and launch products as anticipated, our ability to maintain or expand our market position in the markets in which we participate may be materially adversely impacted. Further, we are continuing to investigate, and have completed several acquisitions involving, opportunities to further expand our presence in, and diversify into priority growth areas. Expanding our focus beyond our current businesses is expensive and time consuming. Further, there can be no assurance that we will be able to access these 25 Table of Contents technologies on terms favorable to us, or that these technologies will achieve commercial feasibility, obtain regulatory approval or gain market acceptance. A delay in the development or approval of these technologies or our decision to reduce our investments may adversely impact the contribution of these technologies to our future growth. The medical device industry is experiencing greater scrutiny and regulation by governmental authorities and is the subject of numerous investigations, often involving marketing and other business practices. These investigations could result in the commencement of civil and criminal proceedings; substantial fines, penalties and administrative remedies; divert the attention of our management; impose administrative costs and have an adverse effect on our financial condition, results of operations and liquidity; and may lead to greater governmental regulation in the future. The medical devices we design, develop, manufacture and market are subject to rigorous regulation by the FDA and numerous other federal, state and foreign governmental authorities. These authorities have been increasing their scrutiny of our industry. We have received subpoenas and other requests for information from Congress and other state and federal governmental agencies, including, among others, the U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ), the Office of Inspector General of the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS), and the Department of Defense. We have also received subpoenas and other requests for information from comparable international governmental agencies. These investigations relate primarily to financial arrangements with healthcare providers, regulatory compliance and product promotional practices. We have cooperated with these investigations and responded to these requests, and expect to continue to do so in the future. We cannot predict when the investigations will be resolved, the outcome of these investigations or their impact on us, and cooperation may involve significant costs, including document production costs. An adverse outcome in 1 or more of these investigations could include the commencement of civil and criminal proceedings; substantial fines, penalties and administrative remedies, including exclusion from government reimbursement programs, entry into Corporate Integrity Agreements (CIAs) with governmental agencies and amendments to existing CIAs. In addition, resolution of any of these matters could involve the imposition of additional and costly compliance obligations. For example, in 2009, we entered into a civil settlement with the DOJ regarding the DOJ's investigation relating to certain post market surveys conducted by Guidant Corporation before we acquired Guidant in 2006. As part of the settlement, we entered into a CIA with the Office of Inspector General for HHS. The CIA requires enhancements to certain compliance procedures related to financial arrangements with healthcare providers. The obligations imposed upon us by the CIA and cooperation with ongoing investigations involve employee resource costs and diversion of employee focus. We may incur additional future costs to fulfill the obligations imposed upon us by the CIA. Further, the CIA, and if any of the ongoing investigations continue over a long period of time, could further divert the attention of management from the day to day operations of our business and impose significant additional administrative burdens on us. These potential consequences, as well as any adverse outcome from these investigations, could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of operations and liquidity. In addition, certain state governments (including that of Massachusetts, where we are headquartered) and the federal government have enacted legislation aimed at increasing transparency of our interactions with healthcare providers. As a result, we are required by law to disclose payments and other transfers for value to healthcare providers licensed by certain states and, starting with payments or other transfers of value made on or after August 1, 2013, to all U.S. physicians and U.S. teaching hospitals at the federal level. Any failure to comply with these legal and regulatory requirements could impact our business. In addition, we have and may continue to devote substantial additional time and financial resources to further develop and implement enhanced structure, policies, systems and processes to comply with enhanced legal and regulatory requirements, which may also impact our business. Further, Supreme Court case law has clarified that the FDA's authority over medical devices preempts certain state tort laws, but recently federal appeals courts have determined that some state tort law claims remain, and legislation has been introduced at the federal level to allow state intervention, all of which could lead to increased and inconsistent regulation at the state level. Changes in tax laws, unfavorable resolution of tax contingencies, or exposure to additional income tax liabilities could have a material impact on our financial condition, results of operations and or liquidity. We are subject to income taxes as well as non income based taxes, in both the U.S. and various foreign jurisdictions. We are subject to on going tax audits in various jurisdictions. Tax authorities may disagree with certain positions we have taken and assess additional taxes. We regularly assess the likely outcomes of these audits in order to determine the appropriateness of our tax provision and have established contingency reserves for material, known tax exposures, including potential tax audit adjustments related to transfer pricing methodology disputes. We have received Notices of Deficiency from the IRS reflecting proposed audit adjustments for Guidant Corporation for its 2001 through 2006 tax years and Boston Scientific Corporation for its 2006 and 2007 tax years. We have filed, or will timely file, petitions with the U.S. Tax Court contesting the Notices of Deficiency for the tax years in challenge. There can be no assurance that we will accurately predict the outcomes of these disputes or other tax audits or that issues raised by tax authorities will be resolved at a financial cost that does not exceed our related reserves, and the actual outcomes of these audits could have a material impact on our results of operations or financial condition. Additionally, changes in tax laws or tax rulings could materially impact our effective tax rate. For example, new legislation imposes on medical device 26 Table of Contents manufacturers a 23 percent excise tax on U.S. sales of Class I, II and III medical devices beginning in January 2013 Proposals for fundamental U.S. corporate tax reform, if enacted, could have a significant adverse impact on our future results of operations. We may not effectively be able to protect our intellectual property or other sensitive Company data, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. The medical device market in which we primarily participate is largely technology driven. Physician customers, particularly in interventional cardiology, have historically moved quickly to new products and new technologies. As a result, intellectual property rights, particularly patents and trade secrets, play a significant role in product development and differentiation. However, intellectual property litigation is inherently complex and unpredictable and appellate courts can overturn lower court patent decisions. Furthermore, as our business increasingly relies on technology systems and infrastructure, our intellectual property, other proprietary technology and other sensitive Company data is potentially vulnerable to loss, damage or misappropriation. Competing parties in our industry frequently file multiple suits to leverage patent portfolios across product lines, technologies and geographies and to balance risk and exposure between the parties. In some cases, several competitors are parties in the same proceeding, or in a series of related proceedings, or litigate multiple features of a single class of devices. These forces frequently drive settlement not only of individual cases, but also of a series of pending and potentially related and unrelated cases. In addition, although m1tary and injunctive relief is typically sought, remedies and restitution are generally not determined until the conclusion of the trial court proceedings and can be modified on appeal. Accordingly, the outcomes of individual cases are difficult to time, predict or quantify and are often dependent upon the outcomes of other cases in other geographies. Several third parties have asserted that our current and former product offerings infringe patents owned or licensed by them. We have similarly asserted that products sold by our competitors infringe patents owned or licensed by us. Adverse outcomes in 1 or more of the proceedings against us could limit our ability to sell certain products in certain jurisdictions, or reduce our operating margin on the sale of these products and could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of operations or liquidity. Patents and other proprietary rights are and will continue to be essential to our business, and our ability to compete effectively with other companies will be dependent upon the proprietary nature of our technologies. We rely upon trade secrets, know how, continuing technological innovations, strategic alliances and licensing opportunities to develop, maintain and strengthen our competitive position. We pursue a policy of generally obtaining patent protection in both the U.S. and abroad for patentable subject matter in our proprietary devices and attempt to review third party patents and patent applications to the extent publicly available in order to develop an effective patent strategy, avoid infringement of third party patents, identify licensing opportunities and monitor the patent claims of others. We currently own numerous U.S. and foreign patents and have numerous patent applications pending. We also are party to various license agreements pursuant to which patent rights have been obtained or granted in consideration for cash, cross licensing rights or royalty payments. No assurance can be made that any pending or future patent applications will result in the issuance of patents, that any current or future patents issued to, or licensed by, us will not be challenged or circumvented by our competitors, or that our patents will not be found invalid. In addition, we may have to take legal action in the future to protect our patents, trade secrets or know how or to assert them against claimed infringement by others. Any legal action of that type could be costly and time consuming and no assurances can be made that any lawsuit will be successful. We are generally involved as both a plaintiff and a defendant in a number of patent infringement and other intellectual property related actions. The invalidation of key patents or proprietary rights that we own, or an unsuccessful outcome in lawsuits to protect our intellectual property, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. In addition, the laws of certain countries in which we market, and plan on manufacturing in the near future, some of our products do not protect our intellectual property rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States. If we are unable to protect our intellectual property in these countries, it could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Furthermore, our intellectual property, other proprietary technology and other sensitive Company data is potentially vulnerable to loss, damage or misappropriation from system malfunction, computer viruses, unauthorized access to our data or misappropriation or misuse thereof by those with permitted access, and other events. While we have invested to protect our intellectual property and other data, and continue to work diligently in this area, there can be no assurance that our precautionary measures will prevent breakdowns, breaches, cyber attacks or other events. Such events could have a material adverse effect on our reputation, business, financial condition or results of operations. 27 Table of Contents Pending and future intellectual property litigation could be costly and disruptive to us. We operate in an industry that is susceptible to significant intellectual property litigation and, in recent years, it has been common for companies in the medical device field to aggressively challenge the patent rights of other companies in order to prevent the marketing of new devices. We are currently the subject of various patent litigation proceedings and other proceedings described in more detail under Item 3 Legal Proceedings and Note K Commitments and Contingencies to our 2012 consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this Annual Report . Intellectual property litigation is expensive, complex and lengthy and its outcome is difficult to predict. Adverse outcomes in 1 or more of these matters could have a material adverse effect on our ability to sell certain products and on our operating margins, financial condition, results of operation or liquidity. Pending or future patent litigation may result in significant royalty or other payments or injunctions that can prevent the sale of products and may significantly divert the attention of our technical and management personnel. In the event that our right to market any of our products is successfully challenged, we may be required to obtain a license on terms which may not be favorable to us, if at all. If we fail to obtain a required license or are unable to design around a patent, our business, financial condition or results of operations could be materially adversely affected. Pending and future product liability claims and other litigation, including private securities litigation, shareholder derivative suits and contract litigation, may adversely affect our business, reputation and ability to attract and retain customers. The design, manufacture and marketing of medical devices of the types that we produce entail an inherent risk of product liability claims. Many of the medical devices that we manufacture and sell are designed to be implanted in the human body for long periods of time or indefinitely. A number of factors could result in an unsafe condition or injury to, or death of, a patient with respect to these or other products that we manufacture or sell, including physician technique and experience in performing the surgical procedure, comp1nt failures, manufacturing flaws, design defects or inadequate disclosure of product related risks or product related information. These factors could result in product liability claims, a recall of 1 or more of our products or a safety alert relating to 1 or more of our products. Product liability claims may be brought by individuals or by groups seeking to represent a class. We are currently the subject of product liability litigation proceedings and other proceedings described in more detail under Item 3 Legal Proceedings and Note K Commitments and Contingencies to our 2012 consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this Annual Report . The outcome of litigation, particularly class action lawsuits, is difficult to assess or quantify. Plaintiffs in these types of lawsuits often seek recovery of very large or indeterminate amounts, including not only actual damages, but also punitive damages. The magnitude of the potential losses relating to these lawsuits may remain unknown for substantial periods of time. In addition, the cost to defend against any future litigation may be significant. Further, we maintain an insurance policy providing limited coverage against securities claims, and we are substantially self insured with respect to product liability claims and fully self insured with respect to intellectual property infringement claims. The absence of significant third party insurance coverage increases our potential exposure to unanticipated claims and adverse decisions. Product liability claims, securities and commercial litigation and other litigation in the future, regardless of the outcome, could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, results of operations or liquidity. Any failure to meet regulatory quality standards applicable to our manufacturing and quality processes could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. As a medical device manufacturer, we are required to register with the FDA and are subject to periodic inspection by the FDA for compliance with its Quality System Regulation requirements, which require manufacturers of medical devices to adhere to certain regulations, including testing, quality control and documentation procedures. In addition, the Federal Medical Device Reporting regulations require us to provide information to the FDA whenever there is evidence that reasonably suggests that a device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or, if a malfunction were to occur, could cause or contribute to a death or serious injury. Compliance with applicable regulatory requirements is subject to continual review and is monitored rigorously through periodic inspections by the FDA which may result in observations on Form 483, and in some cases warning letters, that require corrective action. In the European Community, we are required to maintain certain International Standards Organization (ISO) certifications in order to sell our products and must undergo periodic inspections by notified bodies to obtain and maintain these certifications. If we, or our manufacturers, fail to adhere to quality system regulations or ISO requirements, this could delay production of our products and lead to fines, difficulties in obtaining regulatory clearances, recalls, enforcement actions, including injunctive relief or consent decrees, or other consequences, which could, in turn, have a material adverse effect on our financial condition or results of operations. 28 Table of Contents Interruption of our manufacturing operations could adversely affect our results of operations and financial condition. Our products are designed and manufactured in technology centers around the world, either by us or third parties. In most cases, the manufacturing of our products is concentrated in 1 or a few locations. Factors such as a failure to follow specific internal protocols and procedures, equipment malfunction, environmental factors or damage to 1 or more of our facilities could adversely affect our ability to manufacture our products. In the event of an interruption in manufacturing, we may be unable to quickly move to alternate means of producing affected products or to meet customer demand. In some instances, for example, if the interruption is a result of a failure to follow regulatory protocols and procedures, we may experience delays in resuming production of affected products due primarily to needs for regulatory approvals. As a result, we may experience loss of market share, which we may be unable to recapture, and harm to our reputation, which could adversely affect our results of operations and financial condition. We rely on external manufacturers to supply us with certain materials, comp1nts and products. Any disruption in our sources of supply or the price of inventory supplied to us could adversely impact our production efforts and could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations. We purchase many of the materials and comp1nts used in manufacturing our products, some of which are custom made from third party vendors. Certain supplies are purchased from single sources due to quality considerations, expertise, costs or constraints resulting from regulatory requirements. In the event of a disruption in supply, we may not be able to establish additional or replacement suppliers for certain comp1nts, materials or products in a timely manner largely due to the complex nature of our and many of our suppliers' manufacturing processes. In addition, our products require sterilization prior to sale and we rely on a mix of internal resources and third party vendors to perform this service. Production issues, including capacity constraint; the inability to sterilize our products; quality issues affecting us or our suppliers; an inability to develop and validate alternative sources if required; or a significant increase in the price of materials or comp1nts could adversely affect our results of operations and financial condition. Our share price will fluctuate, and accordingly, the value of an investment in our common stock may also fluctuate. Stock markets in general, and our common stock in particular, have experienced significant price and volume volatility over recent years. The market price and trading volume of our common stock may continue to be subject to significant fluctuations due not only to general stock market conditions, but also to variability in the prevailing sentiment regarding our operations or business prospects, as well as, among other things, changing investment priorities of our shareholders. If we are unable to attract, retain and focus key personnel, it could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results from operations. We constantly monitor the dynamics of the economy, the healthcare industry and the markets in which we compete; and we continue to assess opportunities to improve operational effectiveness and better align expenses with revenues, while preserving our ability to make needed investments, research and development projects, capital and our people that we believe are essential to our long term success. In our industry, there is substantial competition for key personnel in the regions in which we operate and we may face increased competition for such employees, particularly in emerging markets as the trend toward globalization continues. If we are unable to attract key personnel in a timely manner, including key sales and other personnel who have critical industry experience and relationships in the regions in which we operate, including in emerging markets such as Brazil, Russia, India and China, it may have an adverse effect on our business and our ability to drive growth, including through execution of our strategic initiatives. Furthermore, some of the key personnel for whom we compete have post employment arrangements with their current or former employer that may impact our ability to hire them or expose us and them to claims. In addition, if we are unable to retain and focus our existing key personnel it may have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results from operations. Moreover, we recently completed changes in our senior management structure, which may lead to inefficiencies and have an adverse effect on our business and results of operations. 29 Table of Contents ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS N1 ITEM 2 PROPERTIES
